Massachusetts, session 194th, H2729.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 18¾ of chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following clause:-
(16) to develop and implement a statewide blue alert system to be activated when law
enforcement officials are searching for an individual who is wanted in the serious injury or
killing of a police officer, state trooper, or other law enforcement official.
SECTION 2. Chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 18AA the following section:-
Section 18BB. The executive office of public safety shall coordinate the implementation
of a statewide blue alert system, pursuant to section 21 of chapter 22.
SECTION 3. Chapter 22 of The General Laws are hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
of 2

Section 23.
THE STATEWIDE BLUE ALERT SYSTEM
Section 1. The following terms as used in this chapter shall, unless the context clearly
appears otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Executive office”, the executive office of public safety.
"Law enforcement agency", a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the
investigation of a crime resulting in the serious injury or death of a police officer, state trooper,
or other law enforcement official.
of 2